North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-22 Compromise of Controversies

30.1-22-01. (3-1101)
Effect of approval of agreements involving trusts, inalienable interests, or interest of third persons.

A compromise of any controversy as to admission to probate of any instrument offered for formal probate as the will of a decedent, the construction, validity, or effect of any governing instrument, the rights or interests in the estate of the decedent, of any successor, or the administration of the estate, if approved in a formal proceeding in the court for that purpose, is binding on all the parties thereto, including those unborn, unascertained, or who could not be located. An approved compromise is binding even though it may affect a trust or an inalienable interest. A compromise does not impair the rights of creditors or of taxing authorities who are not parties to it.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1; 1995, ch. 322, § 24.

Collateral References.

Claim due estate, power and responsibility of executor or administrator to compromise, 72 A.L.R.2d 191.

Claim against estate, power and responsibility of executor or administrator to compromise, 72 A.L.R.2d 243.

Death: power and responsibility of executor or administrator as to compromise or settlement of action or cause of action for death, 72 A.L.R.2d 285.

Testator’s estate, family settlement of, 29 A.L.R.3d 8.

Intestate estate, family settlement of, 29 A.L.R.3d 174.

30.1-22-02. (3-1102)
Procedure for securing court approval of compromise.

The procedure for securing court approval of a compromise is as follows:

The terms of the compromise shall be set forth in an agreement in writing which shall be executed by all competent persons and parents or guardians acting for any minor children having beneficial interests or having claims which will or may be affected by the compromise. Execution is not required by any person whose identity cannot be ascertained or whose whereabouts is unknown and cannot reasonably be ascertained.

Any interested person, including the personal representative, if any, or a trustee, then may submit the agreement to the court for its approval and for execution by the personal representative, the trustee of every affected testamentary trust, and other fiduciaries and representatives.

After notice to all interested persons or their representatives, including the personal representative of any estate and all affected trustees, the court, if it finds that the contest or controversy is in good faith and that the effect of the agreement upon the interests of persons represented by fiduciaries or other representatives is just and reasonable, shall make an order approving the agreement and directing all fiduciaries under its supervision to execute the agreement. Minor children represented only by their parents or guardians may be bound only if their parents or guardians join with other competent persons in execution of the compromise. Upon the making of the order and the execution of the agreement, all further disposition of the estate is in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1; 1995, ch. 322, § 25.